Louisiana, session 2026, HB354.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The bridge located on Louisiana Highway 64 spanning the Amite River
at the boundary between East Baton Rouge Parish and Livingston Parish, commonly known
as the Magnolia Bridge, which connects Greenwell Springs Road in East Baton Rouge
Parish to Magnolia Bridge Road in Livingston Parish shall be known and is hereby
redesignated as the "Caleb Easterling Memorial Bridge".
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 354 ENROLLED
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2